Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 26

Electrologists Practice Act

63-26-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Electrologists Practice Act.”

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 3; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-201.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1993, ch. 342, § 1 transferred this chapter, formerly title 62, chapter 34, part 2, and reenacted it without change, effective October 1, 1993.

63-26-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of health and includes designees of the commissioner of health;

“Electrologist” means any person practicing electrolysis for the permanent removal of hair;

“Electrology” means the art and practice relating to the removal of hair from the normal skin of the human body by application of an electric current to the hair papilla by means of a needle or needles so as to cause growth inactivity of the hair papilla and thus permanently remove the hair;

“Electrology instructor” means an electrologist who is licensed by the commissioner to practice and teach electrology;

“Electrolysis” means the process by which the hair is removed from the normal skin by the application of an electric current to the hair root by means of a needle or needles, whether the process employs direct electric current or short wave alternating electric current or combination of both, or by FDA approved laser beam process designated for permanent hair removal; and

“School” means an electrology school teaching the art of electrology.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 4; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-202; Acts 2009, ch. 456, §§ 1, 37.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

63-26-103. Prohibited practices.

This chapter does not authorize the use of roentgen rays and radium for diagnostic and therapeutic purposes, or the use of electricity for purposes of skin cauterization, removal of warts, moles or other skin deformities.

Electronic tweezers or nonneedle methods are prohibited within the practice of electrology, except as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 5; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-203.

63-26-104. [Reserved.]

63-26-106. Personnel.

Subject to appropriations for that purpose, the director of the division of health related boards shall employ and supervise all administrative personnel necessary to conduct the functions of this chapter.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 8; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-206; Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

63-26-107. Cumulative deficit of the board of electrolysis examiners — Disposition of fees — Expenditures.

Any cumulative deficit of the board of electrolysis examiners remaining on June 23, 2009, shall be transferred to the account created in subsection (b) to be eliminated through payment of fees assessed on persons regulated pursuant to this chapter.

All fees collected by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited by the state treasurer in a separate account exclusively for the electrolysis program established in this chapter, and shall be used by the commissioner to defray expenses necessary to administer this chapter. Unexpended and unobligated fees remaining in this account at the end of any fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall be used to eliminate the cumulative deficit of the board of electrolysis examiners remaining on June 23, 2009. Upon elimination of the deficit, unexpended and unobligated fees remaining in this account shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain available for the purposes set forth in this chapter. Penalties imposed by the commissioner shall be deposited into the state general fund.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 9; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-207; Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

Cross-References. Funds, deposits and disbursements, § 63-1-137.

License and registration fees, § 63-1-112.

63-26-108. Powers and duties of commissioner of health.

The commissioner of health shall:

Promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary and reasonable for the enforcement of this chapter;

Establish continuing education requirements;

Establish standards for the training and practice of electrolysis;

Maintain a list of all current licensed electrologists, licensed electrolysis schools and training centers, and licensed electrology instructors; and

Adopt a code of ethics governing the practice of electrology by licensees under this chapter.

In no event shall this chapter be interpreted as conferring on the commissioner the authority or jurisdiction to regulate the practice of medicine or osteopathy by persons licensed under chapter 6 or 9 of this title, or to regulate the activities of those persons employed by such licensed physicians, and who perform services under the supervision and control of licensed physicians or osteopaths who have made an evaluation of the patient and who have supervised a diagnostic screening with respect to the patient, unless such employees or agents are holding themselves out to be licensed electrologists. It is the specific intent of the general assembly that the regulation of the practice of medicine or osteopathy falls within the sole and exclusive purview of the licensing boards designated under chapter 6 and 9 of this title. Further, the commissioner shall have no jurisdiction or authority to regulate in any manner the practice of electrology by individuals licensed under chapter 6 or 9 of this title.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 10; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-208; Acts 1995, ch. 420, § 3; 2009, ch. 456, §§ 6-8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

Attorney General Opinions. A physician or registered nurse may be a member of a professional limited liability company (PLLC) “for the practice of electrolysis” only if the physician or the registered nurse holds a license to practice electrology; however, a medical doctor may be member of a PLLC for the practice of medicine and engage, in that capacity, in the practice of activities that would otherwise constitute the practice of electrology and may also employ a registered nurse who is not licensed as an electrologist to perform electrology services under the doctor's supervision and control, OAG 01-002, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/4/01).

63-26-109. Setting of fees.

The commissioner shall set fees for applications, examinations, renewals, reciprocity, school licensure and other related matters.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 11; 1989, ch. 523, § 213; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-209; Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

Cross-References. Funds, deposits and disbursements, § 63-1-137.

License and registration fees, § 63-1-112.

63-26-110. Civil liability.

A person who acts in good faith shall not be civilly liable for providing information to the commissioner or a designee of the commissioner on any matter relative to the practice of electrolysis. This section shall apply to any person who acts in good faith to provide information to a designee of the commissioner in the course of an investigation of the practice of electrolysis.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 12; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A, § 62-34-210; Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

63-26-111. Qualifications of applicants.

An applicant for a license to be an electrologist must:

Be at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Be of good moral character;

Have been graduated by an accredited high school or have completed equivalent recognized education;

Have completed an electrology education program that is approved under this chapter, which includes:

At least one hundred fifty (150) hours of electrolysis theory and at least three hundred fifty (350) hours of clinical practice taught by a licensed electrology instructor;

An electrology education program in any other state that the commissioner determines is substantially equivalent to that required by subdivision (4)(A); or

At least six hundred (600) hours of electrology practice taught by a dermatologist approved by the commissioner who has documented continuing education in electrology theory and practice;

Applicants who satisfy the educational requirements for licensure under this subdivision (4)(C) shall be eligible for practice as an electrologist only under the direct supervision and control of a dermatologist approved by the commissioner, and shall receive a limited license that bears an endorsement to that effect, upon passing the state board examination, payment of all prescribed fees and the satisfying of license renewal fees and requirements;

The dermatologist shall notify the commissioner or the commissioner's designee as to each student who begins the training program pursuant to this subdivision (4)(C);

The dermatologist shall also notify the commissioner or the commissioner's designee when an electrologist is no longer under the supervision and control of such dermatologist; and

Hours of training and experience received by applicants after January 1, 1989, may be applied to the experience provisions of this subdivision (4)(C);

Have successfully passed an examination approved by the commissioner;

Have paid all fees required by this chapter; and

Have submitted an application to the commissioner on a prescribed form.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 13; 1990, ch. 872, § 1; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-211; Acts 2009, ch. 456, §§ 11-17.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-26-112. Qualifications to be instructor.

To be eligible for licensing as an electrology instructor, in addition to the requirements of the registered electrologist, an applicant shall have:

Practiced electrolysis actively for at least five (5) of the last ten (10) years prior to the application;

Successfully passed an examination for an electrology instructor license that consists of written and verbal sections covering theoretical and clinical studies;

Paid an examination fee set by the commissioner; and

Submitted to the commissioner at least thirty (30) days before the examination is administered an approved form for application for license.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 14; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-212; Acts 2009, ch. 456, §§ 18-20.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-26-113. Examinations.

Examinations for qualified applicants shall be offered at least once a year at the times and places determined by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee.

Completed applications for examination must be received by the commissioner thirty (30) days prior to the examination date.

The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall notify each qualified applicant of the time and place of examination.

The commissioner shall select an examination in which the testing and grading systems are recognized as standard in the field of professional licensure examinations.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 15; 1990, ch. 872, § 2; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-213; Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 21.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

63-26-114. Reexamination.

If a candidate fails a part or parts of an examination, the candidate may retake a failed section of the examination or retake a subsequent examination, after paying the reexamination fee and submitting the commissioner-approved form for reexamination at least thirty (30) days prior to reexamination date.

If, after two (2) attempts, the examination is not passed, the complete examination may be taken again only after the candidate:

Completes an additional electrolysis education program that the commissioner recommends; and

Pays the full examination fee.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 16; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-214; Acts 2009, ch. 456, §§ 22, 38.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

63-26-115. Licensing without examination.

Without the required examination, the commissioner shall approve as a licensed electrologist any person meeting the provisions of § 63-26-111(1)-(3), (6) and (7) and who has actively been engaged in the practice of electrology in this state for a period of six (6) months or more prior to making application for licensure.

Payment of the scheduled registration fee to the commissioner shall accompany an application.

Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2), no electrologist shall be registered by the commissioner to practice without examination, unless a recognized out-of-state license is valid and acceptable.

The commissioner is authorized to register an electrologist to practice in this state without taking the required examination, even if an out-of-state license has not been issued, to a person who provides proof satisfactory to the commissioner that:

The person requesting a license has practiced electrology five (5) years or more in a state that does not require a license for practice; and

The person is a certified electrologist; or

The person requesting a license meets requirements as determined by rules adopted by the commissioner.

The commissioner shall require satisfactory documentation of any prior continuous electrolysis practice.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 17; 1989, ch. 360, § 65; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-215; Acts 2006, ch. 742, § 1; 2009, ch. 456, § 23.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-26-116. Licensing of instructors without examination.

The commissioner shall approve as a licensed electrology instructor without the required examination any person who meets the waiver requirements in § 63-26-115 and who has taught electrology for at least three (3) consecutive years prior to June 30, 1989.

The commissioner shall require satisfactory documentation of prior continuous teaching in electrology.

Application for an electrology teaching license shall be made on a form provided by the commissioner.

Payment of the scheduled fee for an electrology instructor license shall accompany an application.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 18; 1989, ch. 360, § 66; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-216; Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 24.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-26-117. Waiver of examination.

The commissioner may grant a waiver of examination; provided, that the applicant:

Provides adequate evidence that an electrology license was acquired after passing an electrology examination in another state, and that the examination was substantially equivalent to the examination for which the applicant seeks waiver in this state;

Became licensed in another state after meeting other requirements that are substantially equivalent to the requirements of this chapter;

Pays the appropriate application and license fees; and

Submits the required application form for licensing.

The commissioner may grant a waiver of examination for an electrology instructor license; provided, that the applicant:

Furnishes proof that the applicant has met the requirements of subdivisions (a)(1) and (2);

Has filed an application for a license; and

Has paid the required license fee.

The commissioner or a designee of the commissioner shall have the discretion to grant a waiver of examination to an applicant; provided, that a written explanation of the waiver is provided to the applicant and made available to persons requesting a copy of the explanation.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 19; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-217; Acts 2009, ch. 456, §§ 25, 39.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

63-26-118. Issuance of license — Display — Changes.

The commissioner shall issue a license to an applicant meeting the requirements of this chapter for the license designation as an electrologist, or an electrology instructor, or an approved school teaching electrology.

All licenses issued by the commissioner must be conspicuously displayed at the site of use.

All licensees shall keep the commissioner informed of any changes of address.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 20; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-218; Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 26.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

Attorney General Opinions. A physician or registered nurse may be a member of a professional limited liability company (PLLC) “for the practice of electrolysis” only if the physician or the registered nurse holds a license to practice electrology; however, a medical doctor may be member of a PLLC for the practice of medicine and engage, in that capacity, in the practice of activities that would otherwise constitute the practice of electrology and may also employ a registered nurse who is not licensed as an electrologist to perform electrology services under the doctor's supervision and control, OAG 01-002, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/4/01).

63-26-119. Authority over educational programs — Fraudulent or deceptive promotions.

In addition to other powers and duties, the commissioner has the authority to:

Set standards by which an electrology education program may be approved;

Review with the state board of education and the Tennessee higher education commission a progressive electrology education program in the state;

Evaluate the need for such programs in the geographical area in which the electrology program will be located;

Approve and license institutions in this state that meet the requirements of the electrology education program;

Maintain a list of the institutions offering electrology education programs approved by the commissioner; and

Remove an institution from the list of institutions that offer approved electrology education if the institution:

Is guilty of fraud or deceit in obtaining or attempting to obtain approval;

Acts in a manner not consistent with generally accepted standards for the practice of electrology;

Violates standards set under this chapter and fails to correct the violation in a reasonable time after notice has been given;

No longer operates a program that is approved under this chapter; or

Promotes electrology in a manner that the commissioner determines is unreasonable, misleading or fraudulent.

The commissioner shall monitor fraudulent or deceptive promotion of permanent hair removal procedures.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 21; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-219; Acts 2009, ch. 456, §§ 27-29; 2019, ch. 459, § 54.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

Acts 2019, ch. 459, § 55 provided that the division of consumer affairs in the department of commerce and insurance shall coordinate with the attorney general and reporter to transfer all documents, information, systems, and other material deemed relevant to the operation of the division of consumer affairs of the office of the attorney general and reporter.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and report such promotions to the division of consumer affairs of the department of commerce and insurance” following “procedures” at the end of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 459, § 56. September 30, 2019.

Cross-References. Display of license or registration certificate, § 63-1-109.

Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-26-120. Renewal of licenses — Revocation and reinstatement.

Each licensed electrologist and each licensed electrology instructor shall pay the scheduled annual renewal fee to the commissioner, payable in advance, for the following year on or before December 31 of each year that such renewal fee is due.

Each licensed electrology school shall pay the scheduled annual renewal fee to the commissioner, payable in advance, for the following year on or before December 1 of each year that such renewal fee is due.

The commissioner shall renew the license of each licensee who meets the specified requirements for renewal or for registration.

When any electrologist licensee, electrology instructor licensee, or licensed electrology school shall fail to register and pay the annual registration fee within sixty (60) days after such registration becomes due, the license of such person or school shall be automatically revoked without further notice or hearing.

Any person or school whose license is automatically revoked may make application in writing to the commissioner for the reinstatement of such license, and upon good cause being shown, the commissioner, in the commissioner's discretion, may reinstate such license upon payment of all past-due renewal fees and upon payment of the scheduled reinstatement fee.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 22; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-220; Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 30.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

Cross-References. Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

License and registration fees, § 63-1-112.

License renewals, § 63-1-107.

Penalty for practicing without license, § 63-26-127.

63-26-121. Retirement from practice.

Any licensee who has retired, or may hereafter retire from practice in this state, shall not be made to register if such person files with the commissioner an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the commissioner. The affidavit shall state the date on which the person retired from practice and any other facts the commissioner deems necessary to verify the retirement. If such person thereafter reengages in practice in this state, then such person shall apply for registration with the commissioner and meet any other requirements as may be prescribed by the commissioner.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 23; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-221; Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 31.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

Cross-References. Retirement, § 63-1-111.

63-26-122. Unlawful practice.

It is unlawful for any person to practice or attempt to practice electrology in this state, unless such person has been issued a valid and current license to practice electrology. This section does not apply to a student who is practicing electrolysis as part of an approved electrolysis education program.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 22; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-222.

Attorney General Opinions. A physician or registered nurse may be a member of a professional limited liability company (PLLC) “for the practice of electrolysis” only if the physician or the registered nurse holds a license to practice electrology; however, a medical doctor may be member of a PLLC for the practice of medicine and engage, in that capacity, in the practice of activities that would otherwise constitute the practice of electrology and may also employ a registered nurse who is not licensed as an electrologist to perform electrology services under the doctor's supervision and control, OAG 01-002, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/4/01).

63-26-123. Grounds for suspending, revoking or denying a license.

The commissioner has the authority to suspend, revoke or otherwise deny a license whenever a licensee is found guilty of any of the following acts or offenses:

Fraud in procuring a license;

Conviction of a felony;

Habitual intoxication or addiction to the use of narcotic drugs or controlled substances or controlled substance analogues;

Immoral, unprofessional, unethical or dishonorable conduct; or

Professional connection or association with any person, firm or corporation in any manner in an effort to avoid and circumvent this chapter, or lending one's name to another for the illegal practice of electrology by such person.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 25; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-223; Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 32; 2012, ch. 848, § 82; 2018, ch. 745, § 40.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

63-26-124. Administrative procedures.

All proceedings shall be in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 26; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-224.

63-26-125. Enjoining prohibited practices.

The commissioner is authorized and empowered to petition any circuit or chancery court having jurisdiction to enjoin any person who is practicing or attempting to practice electrology without possessing a valid license to practice, and to enjoin any person, firm or corporation from performing any act or rendering any service that constitutes the practice of electrology.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 27; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-225; Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 33.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

63-26-126. Assistance of district attorneys general.

The commissioner shall at all times have the power to call upon the district attorneys general in the various districts to assist the commissioner. It is hereby declared to be the duty of all district attorneys general throughout the state to assist the commissioner, upon the commissioner's request, in any suit for injunction or prosecution instituted by the commissioner, without charge or additional compensation.

Acts 1988, ch. 896, § 28; 1993, ch. 342, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-34-226; Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 34.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 456, § 41 provided that all rules and regulations filed by the board of electrolysis in the office of secretary of state on June 23, 2009, shall be deemed to be rules and regulations of the commissioner of health. The secretary of state is authorized and directed to change any references to the board of electrolysis to references to the commissioner of health in rules and regulations promulgated by the board of electrolysis pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rules and regulations of the board of electrolysis that were properly promulgated pursuant to title 4, chapter 5 shall remain in effect until subsequently amended or repealed.